Utah statutes.
53A-8a-803.   Program components.

(1)  A district that receives a grant under Section 53A-8a-802 to design and implement a PAR Program, shall use the general guidelines as set forth in this section.

(2)  A district's PAR Program shall consist of the following two sections:

(a)  an induction section for novice teachers; and

(b)  a remediation section for underperforming veteran teachers.

(3)  The induction section of a district's PAR Program shall include the following components:

(a)  a novice teacher is automatically enrolled into the induction section of the PAR Program and assigned a consulting teacher who serves as a mentor;

(b)  the novice teacher receives help from a consulting teacher in setting up a classroom, securing needed supplies, preparing for classroom management, reflecting on lessons, and getting feedback and support;

(c)  the consulting teacher assesses the novice teacher's work and reports to the district's PAR Joint Panel several times throughout the year, with a summative report and evaluation at the end of the year;

(d)  the consulting teacher assists the district's PAR Joint Panel in deciding whether to hire the novice teacher for another year; and

(e)  the principal retains the right and responsibility for evaluating all teachers for career employment status.

(4)  The remediation section of a district's PAR Program shall include the following components:

(a)  a principal or supervisor recommends an underperforming veteran teacher to the remediation section of the program, or the underperforming veteran teacher may be automatically enrolled in the intervention section of the program in accordance with local school board policy;

(b)  an underperforming veteran teacher is assigned a consulting teacher who acts as a mentor and initially investigates whether the teacher is, in fact, failing to meet the district standards;

(c)  the consulting teacher mentors the underperforming veteran teacher for a period of time established in accordance with local school board policy; and

(d)  the underperforming veteran teacher either meets district standards after close mentoring, or is dismissed or encouraged to resign because the underperforming veteran teacher rejects help or fails to improve sufficiently despite the consulting teacher's mentoring.

(5)  Consulting teachers:

(a)  are chosen through a competitive process by the district's PAR Joint Panel;

(b) (i)  are released from regular teaching loads for three to five years; or

(ii)  are released from regular teaching part-time and serve as consulting teachers part-time;

(c)  earn regular salary plus an additional stipend for being consulting teachers;

(d)  are assigned a caseload of teachers to mentor and evaluate, preferably in the same subject and grade level;

(e)  report on teachers to the district's PAR Joint Panel; and

(f)  mentor and evaluate teachers participating in the district's PAR Program through:

(i)  scheduled and unscheduled visits;

(ii)  developing a growth plan with a teacher based on the teacher's strengths and weaknesses;

(iii)  observing lessons and providing feedback;

(iv)  helping with lesson planning;

(v)  providing resources and materials; and

(vi)  arranging for a participating teacher to observe another colleague's class.



Enacted by Chapter 273, 2012 General Session

